Arkansas, session 2025, HB1493.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS NORTHEASTERN COLLEGE. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Northeastern College, to be payable from
the Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for renovation/replacement of the Administration Building roof, in
a sum not to exceed ..............................................$1,350,000.
(B) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$680,000.
(C) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$270,000.
(D) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$116,840.

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY - BEEBE. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas State University - Beebe, to be payable
from the Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for renovation of the Owen Center, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,050,000.
*HAR049*
02/17/2025 10:28:48 AM HAR049

HB1493
(B) for renovation of State Hall, in a sum not to exceed ...$2,000,000.
(C) for expansion and update of IT infrastructure, in a sum not to
exceed .............................................................$450,000.
(D) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$450,000.
(E) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$270,000.
(F) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$356,080.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY - MID-SOUTH.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas State University - Mid-South,
to be payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for classroom technology upgrades, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$800,000.
(B) for student laptop upgrades, in a sum not to exceed ......$250,000.
(C) for campus security updates, in a sum not to exceed ......$250,000.
(D) for technology infrastructure upgrades, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$400,000.
(E) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$110,000.
(F) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$570,000.
(G) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
sum not to exceed ...................................................$82,080.

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY - MOUNTAIN HOME.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas State University - Mountain
Home, to be payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for renovation of the Technical Center roof coating, in a sum not
to exceed ........................................................$1,000,000.
(B) for critical maintenance equipment project, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$1,600,000.
(C) for IT infrastructure upgrades/replacement, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$300,000.
(D) for the Vada Sheid Community Center, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$1,000,000.
(E) for security system upgrades, in a sum not to exceed .....$100,000.
(F) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$310,000.
(G) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
02/17/2025 10:28:48 AM HAR049

HB1493
sum not to exceed ..................................................$156,560.

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY - NEWPORT. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas State University - Newport, to be
payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for renovation of the Nursing and Health Professions Building on
the Marked Tree campus, in a sum not to exceed ...................$1,000,000.
(B) for renovation and remodeling of the Main Building on the Jonesboro
campus, in a sum not to exceed ...................................$1,000,000.
(C) for renovation and remodeling of the Main Building on the Marked
Tree campus, in a sum not to exceed ..............................$1,000,000.
(D) for Phase 2 Photovoltaic Solar Array, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$1,000,000.
(E) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$430,000.
(F) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$285,273.

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY THREE RIVERS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas State University Three Rivers,
to be payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for workforce training expansion, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$1,000,000.
(B) for costs of construction of the Career Center Classroom Building,
in a sum not to exceed ...........................................$1,380,000.
(C) for an energy management system, in a sum not to exceed ..$400,000.
(D) for renovation of the Science Building, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$500,000.
(E) for costs of construction of the Facilities Management Building, in
a sum not to exceed ................................................$720,000.
(F) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$240,000.
(G) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
sum not to exceed ...................................................$94,780.

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - BLACK RIVER TECHNICAL COLLEGE. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Black River Technical College, to be payable from
the Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
02/17/2025 10:28:48 AM HAR049

HB1493
(A) for renovation of the RCDC Building, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$697,500.
(B) for renovation of the "A" and "B" Buildings, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$247,500.
(C) for renovation of the Global Education Center, in a sum not to
exceed .............................................................$225,000.
(D) for renovation of the Integrated Automation Technology Lab, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$382,500.
(E) for renovation of the Health Science Complex, in a sum not to
exceed .............................................................$405,000.
(F) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed ..........$70,000.
(G) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$470,000.
(H) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$168,167.

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - COSSATOT COMMUNITY COLLEGE OF THE UNIVERSITY
OF ARKANSAS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Cossatot Community College
of the University of Arkansas, to be payable from the Development and
Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for fiber optic and switch replacements, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$475,000.
(B) for costs of construction of a multi-purpose facility/convocation
center, in a sum not to exceed ...................................$2,955,000.
(C) for roof replacement of the Nashville Atrium, in a sum not to
exceed .............................................................$570,000.
(D) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$100,000.
(E) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$370,000.
(F) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$118,800.

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - NATIONAL PARK COLLEGE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the National Park College, to be payable from the
Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for renovation and repair of Pedestrian Bridge (4), in a sum not to
exceed ...........................................................$88,005.
(B) for renovation and replacement of the Gym Complex HVAC, in a sum
02/17/2025 10:28:48 AM HAR049

HB1493
not to exceed ......................................................$343,000.
(C) for renovation and replacement of the Gerald Fisher CC roof, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$170,690.
(D) for costs of construction of the Welding Technology Center, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$3,398,305.
(E) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$160,000.
(F) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$810,000.
(G) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$285,060.

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - NORTH ARKANSAS COLLEGE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the North Arkansas College, to be payable from the
Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for costs of construction for Bradley Center expansion, in a sum
not to exceed ....................................................$2,195,000.
(B) for technology systems improvements, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$1,245,000.
(C) for the replacement of sliding glass doors, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$275,000.
(D) for the renovation of tiered classrooms to comply with ADA, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$285,000.
(E) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$200,000.
(F) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$430,000.
(G) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$200,613.

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - NORTHWEST ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Northwest Arkansas Community College, to
be payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for end point detection remediation, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$250,000.
(B) for Burns Hall HVAC water units, in a sum not to exceed ..$329,000.
(C) for renovation of White Auditorium, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$277,000.
(D) for costs of construction of Health Professions Building 2, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$4,144,000.
02/17/2025 10:28:48 AM HAR049

HB1493
(E) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$790,000.
(F) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$740,000.
(G) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$773,300.

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - OZARKA COLLEGE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Ozarka College, to be payable from the Development and
Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for renovation of the Administration Building roof and HVAC, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$600,000.
(B) for costs of construction of the Skilled Trades Facility in Ash
Flat, in a sum not to exceed .....................................$2,000,000.
(C) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed ..........$90,000.
(D) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$290,000.
(E) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$100,107.

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - PHILLIPS COMMUNITY COLLEGE OF THE
UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Phillips
Community College of the University of Arkansas, to be payable from the
Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for campus fire and security system upgrades, in a sum not to
exceed ...........................................................$1,750,000.
(B) for ADA compliance improvements, in a sum not to exceed ..$250,000.
(C) for roof repair and replacement, in a sum not to exceed ..$700,000.
(D) for HVAC and LED efficiency upgrades, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$250,000.
(E) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$620,000.
(F) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .......$1,060,000.
(G) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$133,340.

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION - SAU-TECH. There is hereby appropriated, to
the SAU-Tech, to be payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, the
following:
(A) for roof and foundation repair, in a sum not to exceed ...$875,997.
02/17/2025 10:28:48 AM HAR049

HB1493
(B) for HVAC replacement, in a sum not to exceed ...........$2,000,000.
(C) for renovation of Manning Hall and Shumaker Hall, in a sum not to
exceed ...........................................................$1,124,003.
(D) for alarm panel upgrades, in a sum not to exceed .........$175,000.
(E) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$740,000.
(F) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .......$1,050,000.
(G) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$126,933.

SECTION 15. APPROPRIATION - SAU-TECH - ENVIRONMENTAL TRAINING ACADEMY.
There is hereby appropriated, to the SAU-Tech, to be payable from the
Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed ..........$20,000.
(B) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed ..........$20,000.

SECTION 16. APPROPRIATION - SAU-TECH - FIRE TRAINING ACADEMY. There is
hereby appropriated, to the SAU-Tech, to be payable from the Development and
Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for equipment replacement, in a sum not to exceed .........$91,000.
(B) for training ground enhancements, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,172,000.
(C) for HVAC improvements, in a sum not to exceed ............$237,000.
(D) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed ..........$40,000.
(E) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed ..........$60,000.

SECTION 17. APPROPRIATION - SOUTH ARKANSAS COLLEGE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the South Arkansas College, to be payable from the
Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for costs of construction of the Facilities Plant Building, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$1,850,000.
(B) for safety/ADA compliance upgrades, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$150,000.
(C) for the Health Science Center addition, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,000,000.
(D) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$100,000.
(E) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$180,000.
02/17/2025 10:28:48 AM HAR049

HB1493
(F) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$148,193.

SECTION 18. APPROPRIATION - SOUTHEAST ARKANSAS COLLEGE. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Southeast Arkansas College, to be payable from
the Development and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for costs of construction of the SEARK Emergency Operations Center,
in a sum not to exceed ...........................................$3,300,000.
(B) for campus roof replacement for Founders Hall and McGeorge Hall, in
a sum not to exceed ................................................$400,000.
(C) for renovation of the Testing Center, in a sum not to exceed
.....................................................................$50,000.
(D) for renovation of the Commons Building, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$250,000.
(E) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$150,000.
(F) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$330,000.
(G) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$132,687.

SECTION 19. APPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE AT
BATESVILLE. There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas
Community College at Batesville, to be payable from the Development and
Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for renovation of the Gateway Center, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,000,000.
(B) for renovation of the Main Classroom Building, in a sum not to
exceed ...........................................................$1,000,000.
(C) for renovation of the vehicle bridge, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$1,000,000.
(D) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$590,000.
(E) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$230,000.
(F) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$145,967.

SECTION 20. APPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE AT
HOPE-TEXARKANA. There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas
02/17/2025 10:28:48 AM HAR049

HB1493
Community College at Hope-Texarkana, to be payable from the Development and
Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for HVAC replacements, in a sum not to exceed ............$820,000.
(B) for renovation of Hempstead Hall, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$300,000.
(C) for building upgrades and maintenance, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$500,000.
(D) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$340,000.
(E) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$300,000.
(F) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
sum not to exceed ...................................................$97,340.

SECTION 21. APPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE AT
MORRILTON. There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas
Community College at Morrilton, to be payable from the Development and
Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for costs of construction of the Allied Health/Health Sciences
Building, in a sum not to exceed .................................$2,000,000.
(B) for renovation and construction of East Campus infrastructure, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$2,000,000.
(C) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$210,000.
(D) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$230,000.
(E) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$237,367.

SECTION 22. APPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE AT
RICH MOUNTAIN. There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas
Community College at Rich Mountain, to be payable from the Development and
Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for costs of construction of the Health Science Facility, in a sum
not to exceed ....................................................$3,209,000.
(B) for technology upgrade of Lecture Hall, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$590,500.
(C) for the purchase of Allied Health equipment, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$200,500.
(D) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed ..........$60,000.
02/17/2025 10:28:48 AM HAR049

HB1493
(E) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$130,000.
(F) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
sum not to exceed ...................................................$88,933.

SECTION 23. APPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS EAST ARKANSAS
COMMUNITY COLLEGE. There is hereby appropriated, to the University of
Arkansas East Arkansas Community College, to be payable from the Development
and Enhancement Fund, the following:
(A) for switchgear replacement, in a sum not to exceed .......$400,000.
(B) for structural corrections, in a sum not to exceed .......$730,000.
(C) for ground repair new FAC and LRC, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$375,000.
(D) for renovation of roofs, in a sum not to exceed ..........$200,000.
(E) for renovation of Admin and FAC, in a sum not to exceed ..$575,000.
(F) for costs of construction of new welding/HVAC training labs, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$615,000.
(G) for air conditioning for vocational labs, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$100,000.
(H) for demolition of vacant buildings, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$500,000.
(I) for widening the South Campus entrance, in a sum not to exceed
.....................................................................$50,000.
(J) for asphalt for part of Welcome Way, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$195,000.
(K) for painting CTE shops and awnings, in a sum not to exceed
.....................................................................$80,000.
(L) for tower repair, in a sum not to exceed ..................$50,000.
(M) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed ..........$40,000.
(N) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$520,000.
(O) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$100,427.

SECTION 24. APPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS - PULASKI TECHNICAL
COLLEGE. There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas -
Pulaski Technical College, to be payable from the Development and Enhancement
Fund, the following:
02/17/2025 10:28:48 AM HAR049

HB1493
(A) for costs of construction of the Center for Innovation and Applied
Engineering, in a sum not to exceed ..............................$2,920,000.
(B) for renovation of the Allied Health Building, in a sum not to
exceed ...........................................................$1,330,000.
(C) for renovation of the Library, in a sum not to exceed ....$750,000.
(D) for critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed ..........$70,000.
(E) for deferred maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .........$660,000.
(F) for repair or replacement of equipment and library holdings, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$647,020.

SECTION 25. DISBURSEMENT CONTROLS. (A) No contract may be awarded nor
obligations otherwise incurred in relation to the project or projects
described herein in excess of the State Treasury funds actually available
therefor as provided by law. Provided, however, that institutions and
agencies listed herein shall have the authority to accept and use grants and
donations including Federal funds, and to use its unobligated cash income or
funds, or both available to it, for the purpose of supplementing the State
Treasury funds for financing the entire costs of the project or projects
enumerated herein. Provided further, that the appropriations and funds
otherwise provided by the General Assembly for Maintenance and General
Operations of the agency or institutions receiving appropriation herein shall
not be used for any of the purposes as appropriated in this act.
(B) The restrictions of any applicable provisions of the State
Purchasing Law, the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, the
Revenue Stabilization Law and any other applicable fiscal control laws of
this State and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of any funds provided by this act unless specifically provided
otherwise by law.

SECTION 26. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
02/17/2025 10:28:48 AM HAR049

HB1493
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 27. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.






















02/17/2025 10:28:48 AM HAR049